Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 25. Sheriffs

§ 19-25-1.
Commission; term of office; oath and bond.

There shall be chosen one (1) sheriff for each county, who shall be commissioned by the Governor. The sheriff shall continue in office for the term of four (4) years and until his successor shall be qualified, unless sooner removed. Before he enters upon the duties of his office he shall take the oath prescribed by the Constitution, and give bond as prescribed by Section 19-25-5.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3(1); 1857, ch. 6, art 112; 1871, § 219; 1880, § 323; 1892, § 4108; 1906, § 4660; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3077; 1930, § 3306; 1942, § 4231; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 19, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-25-3.
Eligibility to hold office of sheriff; training in law enforcement required.

A person shall not be eligible to the office of sheriff who shall, at the time of the election, be a defaulter to the state, or any county or municipality thereof, or to the United States. Any person who is not a qualified elector, or who denies the existence of a Supreme Being, shall not be eligible to said office. A sheriff shall be eligible to immediately succeed himself in office.

Prior to taking the oath of office and entering into the performance of the duties and obligations of sheriff, or as soon after his election as possible, each sheriff-elect, excluding those who have previously served as sheriff, or have had at least five (5) years’ experience as a full-time enforcement officer, or have previously successfully completed a course of training at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Academy or the Jackson Police Academy, shall, at the expense of the county, attend and complete an appropriate curriculum in the field of law enforcement at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Academy. Any sheriff exempted from attendance because of previous service as sheriff or having five (5) years’ full-time law enforcement experience must have served as sheriff or obtained such experience within a period of ten (10) years prior to the date of his taking the oath of office. Any sheriff exempted from attendance because of successful completion of a course of training at either of the aforementioned academies must have completed such course within five (5) years prior to the date of his taking the oath of office. No sheriff, excluding those specified as being exempt from the initial course in this section, shall until he has attended said Academy be entitled to payment of salary after the first one (1) year in office if he fails to attend said academy as herein provided within one (1) year after his taking office. All sheriffs shall, on a periodic basis, attend additional advanced courses in law enforcement in order that they will be properly informed and trained in the modern, technical advances of law enforcement.

Prior to July 1, 1973, or as soon thereafter as permitted by vacancies at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Academy, either the sheriff or one (1) deputy sheriff in each county having two (2) or more full-time deputies shall, at the expense of the county, attend and complete an appropriate curriculum in the field of narcotics and dangerous drugs at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Academy. In the event that a new sheriff is elected who has not previously received such training or at least one (1) of his deputies has not previously received such training, or if for any other reason neither the sheriff nor any of the deputy sheriffs in a county shall have received such training, then the sheriff shall promptly notify the director of the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Academy and either the sheriff or a deputy sheriff, as soon thereafter as permitted by vacancies at the academy, shall, at the expense of the county, attend and complete an appropriate curriculum in the field of narcotics and dangerous drugs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 112; 1880, § 323; 1892, § 4109; 1906, § 4661; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3078; 1930, § 3307; 1942, § 4232; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 357, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1972).

§ 19-25-5.
Penalties of bond.

The sheriffs of the several counties shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law and in the same manner as other county officials, in a penalty equal to One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), the premium for which shall be paid by the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (2); 1857, ch. 6, art 113; 1871, § 219; 1880, § 324; 1892, § 4110; 1906, § 4662; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3097; 1930, § 3308; 1942, § 4233; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 20, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-25-7.
Remedy on joint and several; officer’s liability first fixed.

The remedy upon sheriff’s bond shall be joint and several against all or any one or more of the obligors. In all suits thereon against the surety or sureties, the liability of the sheriff shall be first fixed, except when the sheriff is a party to the suit, has died or removed or is not found.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 114; 1871, § 220; 1880, § 325; 1892, § 4111; 1906, § 4663; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3080; 1930, § 3309; 1942, § 4234.

§ 19-25-9.
Performance of sheriff’s duties when latter is incapable, unfit, or the like.

If the sheriff be a party to or interested in any suit, or for other cause be incapable or unfit to execute his office in any particular case, or if the sheriff shall have outstanding against him a warrant for his arrest, duly executed by any justice court judge, mayor or municipal judge in the county in which he is sheriff, and where there is no vacancy in the office of sheriff, the circuit judge or chancellor of the district in which said county is located, upon being informed of all the conditions and circumstances with reference thereto, may appoint some qualified elector of the county to execute, do and perform the duties of the sheriff.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (15); 1857, ch. 6, art 151; 1871, § 257; 1880, § 363; 1892, § 828; 1906, § 893; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4060; 1930, § 651; 1942, § 3906; Laws, 1938, ch. 296; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 19-25-11.
Arrest and confinement of sheriff.

In the event there is outstanding a warrant for the arrest of the sheriff of the county issued by any justice of the peace, mayor, or any police justice in said county whereby the said sheriff has been charged by affidavit duly made before said justice of the peace, mayor, or police justice in said county for any misdemeanor or felony, any constable of the county, or any marshal or police officer of any municipality located in said county, may execute said warrant and arrest the said sheriff. In his failure to make bond in the amount as fixed by the justice of the peace, mayor or police justice where said affidavit was made, the officer making the arrest may confine said sheriff in a county jail adjoining the county of his residence, or in any other county jail in the state, and on the date of trial shall deliver him up to the court for trial. Said officer making the arrest shall be the jailer of said county during the confinement of the said sheriff in jail and/or while his cause on said criminal charge is pending for trial, provided the sheriff was jailer and living in the jail at the time of his arrest.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (15); 1857, ch. 6 art 151; 1871, § 257; 1880, § 363; 1892, § 828; 1906, § 893; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4060; 1930, § 651; 1942, § 3906; Laws, 1938, ch. 296.

§ 19-25-13.
Budgeting and financing of sheriffs’ departments.

The sheriff shall, at the July meeting of the board of supervisors, submit a budget of estimated expenses of his office for the ensuing fiscal year beginning October 1 in such form as shall be prescribed by the Director of the State Department of Audit. The board shall examine this proposed budget and determine the amount to be expended by the sheriff in the performance of his duties for the fiscal year and may increase or reduce that amount as it deems necessary and proper.

The budget shall include amounts for compensating the deputies and other employees of the sheriff’s office, for insurance providing protection for the sheriff and his deputies in case of disability, death and other similar coverage, for travel and transportation expenses of the sheriff and deputies, for feeding prisoners and inmates of the county jail, and for any other expenses that may be incurred in the performance of the duties of the office of sheriff. In addition, the budget shall include amounts for the payment of premiums on bonds and insurance for the sheriff and his deputies which, in the opinion of the board of supervisors, are deemed necessary to protect the interests of the county or the sheriff and his deputies. The amounts may include official bonds and any bonds required of his deputies by the sheriff; liability insurance; insurance against false arrest charges; insurance against false imprisonment charges; theft, fire and other hazards insurance; and hospitalization insurance as provided for in Sections 25-15-101 and 25-15-103. The board may authorize the reimbursement of the sheriff and deputies for the use of privately owned automobiles or other motor vehicles in the performance of official duties at the rate provided by law for state officers and employees, or may authorize the purchase by the sheriff of such motor vehicles and such equipment as may be needed for operation of the sheriff’s office, the vehicles and equipment to be owned by the county. In counties that have elected to purchase the motor vehicles and the equipment for the operation of the sheriff’s office, if a sheriff or deputy shall be required in the performance of his official duties, in the event of an emergency, to use his privately owned automobile or other motor vehicle, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, authorize the reimbursement for that use at the rate per mile provided by law for state officers and employees. This shall not be construed as giving an officer a choice of whether to use his own or the county’s vehicle, but shall be construed so as not to penalize an officer who must use his own vehicle because the county’s vehicle was not available.

The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may include in its annual budget for the sheriff’s office an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), which may be expended by the sheriff to provide food, water and beverages for the sheriff, the sheriff’s deputies, state, national and local law enforcement officers, emergency personnel, county employees and members of the general public who the sheriff requests to assist him and his office while in the performance of search and rescue missions, disasters or other emergency operations.

The board of supervisors may acquire one or more credit cards that may be used by the sheriff and his deputies to pay expenses incurred by them when traveling in or out of state in the performance of their official duties. The chancery clerk or county purchase clerk shall maintain complete records of all credit card numbers and all receipts and other documents relating to the use of those credit cards. The sheriff shall furnish receipts for the use of the credit cards each month to the chancery clerk or purchase clerk who shall submit a written report monthly to the board of supervisors, which report shall include an itemized list of all expenditures and use of the credit cards for the month, and the expenditures may be allowed for payment by the county in the same manner as other items on the claims docket. The issuance of a credit card to a sheriff or his deputy under the provisions of this section shall not be construed to authorize the sheriff or deputy sheriff to use the credit card to make any expenditure that is not otherwise authorized by law.

The board of supervisors is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to appropriate and pay a sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) annually as a clothing allowance to each plainclothes investigator employed by the sheriff’s office of that county. The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and having a population of more than thirty-one thousand seven hundred (31,700) but less than thirty-one thousand eight hundred (31,800) according to the 1990 Federal Census may appropriate and pay a sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) annually as a clothing allowance to the administrator of the county jail.

The board of supervisors shall, at its first meeting of each quarter beginning on October 1, January 1, April 1 and July 1, appropriate a lump sum for the sheriff for the expenses of his office during the current quarter. The quarterly appropriation shall be one-fourth (1/4) of the amount approved in the annual budget unless the sheriff requests a different amount. Except in case of emergency, as provided in the county budget law, the appropriation for the quarter beginning in October of the last year of the sheriff’s term shall not exceed one-fourth (1/4) of the annual budget.

The sheriff shall file a report of all expenses of his office incurred during the preceding month with the board of supervisors for approval at its regular monthly meeting in a form to be prescribed by the Director of the State Department of Audit, and upon filing thereof, and approval by the board, the clerk of the board shall issue warrants in payment thereof but not to exceed the budget appropriation for that quarter. Any appropriated funds that are unexpended at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the county general fund.

The budget for the sheriff’s office may be revised at any regular meeting by the board of supervisors. Upon recommendation of the sheriff, the board may at any regular meeting make supplemental appropriations to the sheriff’s office.

Any fees previously required to be paid by a sheriff shall be paid by the board of supervisors by including the estimates therefor in the sheriff’s budget. All fees and charges for services heretofore collected by sheriffs shall be collected by the sheriff and paid monthly into the general fund of the concerned county. However, any fees heretofore collected by those sheriffs from the county shall not be paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4232.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, § 8; Laws, 1972, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 363; Laws, 1989, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 508, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007; Laws, 2018, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 19-25-15.
Identification of sheriffs’ motor vehicles; use of unmarked vehicles.

Motor vehicles purchased or leased by the county for the sheriff’s office shall be clearly marked on both sides with the words “SHERIFF’S DEPARTMENT.” The use of large auto door decals shall constitute compliance with this section. Each such motor vehicle shall be marked on the sides or trunk top with the name of the county in clear letters of no less than four (4) inches in height. However, in instances where such identifying marks will hinder official investigations, the board of supervisors may authorize the sheriff’s department to use a specified number of unmarked vehicles. The approval of the board shall be entered on its minutes and shall contain the manufacturer’s serial number and the reason why the vehicle or vehicles should be exempt from provisions of this section. In addition, the manufacturer’s serial number of all county-owned sheriff’s department vehicles not subject to the exemption shall be included in such resolution or order of approval, and a certified copy thereof shall be furnished the State Department of Audit. Any vehicle found to be in violation of this paragraph shall be reported immediately to the sheriff and the board of supervisors, and fifteen (15) days shall be given for compliance; and if not complied with, such vehicles shall be impounded by the State Auditor until properly marked or exempted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4232.5; Laws, 1968 ch. 369, § 8; Laws, 1975, ch. 489, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 583, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 565, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 334 § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 19-25-17.
Purchase of patrol boats for sheriffs in certain counties.

The board of supervisors of any county in which is located, in whole or in part, a federal flood control reservoir, of a federal waterway, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to expend out of the general fund of the county a sum not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for the purchase of a power-driven boat and related marine equipment for use by the sheriff in rescue, search, and general patrol and enforcement work, and for no other purpose.

The cost of operation and maintenance of said boat and equipment shall be paid by the board of supervisors out of the general fund, but these payments shall not be considered a part of the Five Thousand Dollar ($5,000.00) limitation stipulated above. The boat and equipment shall remain in the custody of the sheriff.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4256.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 223.

§ 19-25-19.
Appointment, oath and compensation of deputy sheriffs.

Every sheriff shall have power to appoint one or more deputies to assist him in carrying out the duties of his office, every such appointment to be in writing, to remove them at pleasure, and to fix their compensation, subject to the budget for the sheriff’s office approved by the county board of supervisors. Such deputies shall have authority to do all the acts and duties enjoined upon their principals. Every deputy sheriff, except such as may be appointed to do a particular act only, before he enters on the duties of office, shall take and subscribe an oath faithfully to execute the office of deputy sheriff, according to the best of his skill and judgment. The appointment, with the certificate of the oath, shall be filed and preserved in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors. All sheriffs shall be liable for the acts of their deputies, and for money collected by them. The circuit court, after a notice and a hearing, shall have power to remove such deputies and also bailiffs, upon a showing that the public interest will be served thereby. Each deputy sheriff shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, a qualified elector of the State of Mississippi, and shall not have been convicted of a felony. Prior to appointing any person a deputy sheriff, the sheriff shall determine that the proposed appointee is of good moral character and is capable of fairly and impartially enforcing the law of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art 115; 1871, § 221; 1880, § 326; 1892, § 4112; 1906, § 4664; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3081; 1930, § 3310; 1942, §§ 4232.5, 4235; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, §§ 3, 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 463, eff from and after October 1, 1988.

§ 19-25-21.
Law enforcement deputies.

The minimum number of deputies having law enforcement duties for each sheriff shall be based upon the total population of his county according to the latest federal decennial census in the following categories:

in counties with a total population of more than fifty thousand (50,000), the sheriff shall regularly employ a minimum of five (5) deputies having law enforcement duties;

in counties with a total population of more than thirty-five thousand (35,000), and not more than fifty thousand (50,000), the sheriff shall regularly employ a minimum of four (4) deputies having law enforcement duties;

in counties with a total population of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000), and not more than thirty-five thousand (35,000), the sheriff shall regularly employ a minimum of three (3) deputies having law enforcement duties;

in counties with a total population of more than fifteen thousand (15,000), and not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000), the sheriff shall regularly employ a minimum of two (2) deputies having law enforcement duties;

in all other counties, the sheriff shall regularly employ a minimum of one (1) deputy sheriff having law enforcement duties.

In those counties comprised of two (2) judicial districts having a total population of thirty-five thousand (35,000) or more, there shall be not less than two (2) deputies in the judicial district in which the sheriff does not reside, one (1) of whom shall be the chief deputy in charge of the office, all of whom shall be subject to the direction of the sheriff. In those counties comprised of two (2) judicial districts having a total population of less than thirty-five thousand (35,000), there shall be at least one (1) deputy in the judicial district in which the sheriff does not reside who shall be subject to the direction of the sheriff.

Each deputy sheriff who shall have law enforcement duties shall, at the expense of the county, attend and complete an appropriate curriculum in the field of law enforcement at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Academy within one (1) year from the date of his appointment, excluding those who have previously served as sheriff, or have had at least five (5) years’ experience as a full-time law enforcement officer, or have previously successfully completed a course of training at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Academy or at the Jackson Police Academy. Any deputy sheriff exempted from attendance at the initial course as herein provided because of previous service as sheriff or having five (5) years’ full-time law enforcement experience must have served as sheriff or obtained such experience within a period of ten (10) years prior to the date of his taking the oath of office. Any deputy sheriff exempted from attendance because of successful completion of a course of training at either of the aforementioned academies must have completed such course within five (5) years prior to the date of his taking the oath of office. Each deputy sheriff shall thereafter, on a periodic and continuing basis, attend additional advanced courses in law enforcement at said Academy in order that each deputy sheriff will be properly informed and trained in the modern, technical advances in the field of law enforcement.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art 115; 1871, § 221; 1880, § 326; 1892, § 4112; 1906, § 4664; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3081; 1930, § 3310; 1942, §§ 4234.5, 4235; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1972, ch. 357, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1972).

§ 19-25-23.
Maintenance of regular and auxiliary deputies; assistance to other counties; assistance for drug enforcement purposes.

Each sheriff shall maintain and cause to be paid a sufficient number of regular deputies, properly trained and adequately equipped, to insure the domestic tranquility within his county. In addition thereto, each sheriff may maintain an adequate number of properly trained auxiliary deputy sheriffs to be equipped, trained and paid from the general county fund. The number of said auxiliary deputies shall be approved by the board of supervisors and may be increased or reduced from time to time by said board. All regular and auxiliary deputies may serve in any other county of the state when requested by the sheriff of such county to preserve law and order therein, the expense thereof to be paid by the county in which they serve. The request shall be made to the sheriff of the county in which said deputies are located and said deputies shall remain under the control of said sheriff except to the extent delegated by said sheriff to the sheriff of the requesting county. In addition, any sheriff may loan any regular or auxiliary deputy to any law enforcement agency of the state or of any political subdivision of the state for drug enforcement purposes, the expense of the officer to be paid by the agency to which the officer is assigned.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1968, ch. 369, § 5; Laws, 1998, ch. 494, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1998).

§ 19-25-25.
Remedy of sheriff against defaulting deputy.

The sheriff shall have the same remedy and judgment against his deputies and their sureties, for failing to pay money received on executions or other process to the sheriff, or to the party to whom the same is payable, or for any other act or default in office, as the creditor at whose suit such writ issued may have against the sheriff.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (8); 1857, ch. 6, art 116; 1871, § 222; 1880, § 327; 1892, § 4113; 1906, § 4665; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3082; 1930, § 3312, 1942, § 4237.

§ 19-25-27.
Deputy liable on motion of sheriff.

When any fine, penalty, or judgment shall be assessed or rendered against a sheriff or his sureties, for or on account of any misconduct of a deputy, the court in which the fine, penalty, or judgment shall be rendered shall, upon motion by the sheriff or his sureties, give judgment against the deputy and his sureties, jointly and severally, for the full amount of all such fines, penalties, or judgments, and shall award execution therefor. The deputy and his sureties shall have five days’ notice of such motion.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (10); 1857, ch. 6, art 118; 1871, § 224; 1880, § 329; 1892, § 4114; 1906, § 4666; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3083; 1930, § 3313; 1942, § 4238.

§ 19-25-29.
Duty of deputy as to process he serves.

When a deputy sheriff has served any writ whatever, he shall indorse thereon the date of the service and the proper return of his proceedings, and subscribe his own name, as well as that of his principal, thereto, as follows: “ , sheriff, by , deputy sheriff”. Any deputy sheriff failing to do so, shall be fined by the court, not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), on motion, and on five days’ notice to the deputy.

Click to view

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (9); 1857, ch. 6, art 117; 1871, § 223; 1880, § 328; 1892, § 4115; 1906, § 4667; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3084; 1930, § 3314; 1942, § 4239.

§ 19-25-31.
Riding bailiffs.

Each judge of a circuit, chancery or county court, or a court of eminent domain may, in the judge’s discretion, by order entered on the minutes of the court, allow the sheriff riding bailiffs to serve in the respective court of such judge, not to exceed four (4) bailiffs. Any such person so employed shall be paid by the county on allowances of the court on issuance of a warrant therefor in an amount of Fifty-five Dollars ($55.00) for each day, or part thereof, for which he serves as bailiff when the court is in session. No full-time deputy sheriff shall be paid as a riding bailiff of any court. County court judges shall be limited to one (1) bailiff per each court day.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3311; 1942, § 4236; Laws, 1926, ch. 198; Laws, 1958, ch. 329; Laws, 1977, ch. 357; Laws, 1989, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 7, eff August 19, 2004 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).

§ 19-25-33.
Dispensing with appointment of bailiffs.

In all civil cases, where there is a jury, and in criminal case capital, the judge of the county court or circuit court, as the case may be, may, in his discretion, dispense with the appointment of bailiffs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4240.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 388, eff from and after passage (approved February 17, 1966).

§ 19-25-35.
Duty of sheriff to attend courts, jail committed persons, and to execute orders and decrees.

The sheriff shall be the executive officer of the circuit and chancery court of his county, and he shall attend all the sessions thereof with a sufficient number of deputies or bailiffs. He shall execute all orders and decrees of said courts directed to him to be executed. He shall take into his custody, and safely keep, in the jail of his county, all persons committed by order of either of said courts, or by any process issuing therefrom, or lawfully required to be held for appearance before either of them.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (13); 1857, ch. 6, art 129; 1871, § 235; 1880, § 2278; 1892, § 4116; 1906, § 4668; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3085; 1930, § 3315; 1942, § 4240.

§ 19-25-37.
Duty of sheriff to execute and return process.

Every sheriff, by himself or his deputy, shall from time to time execute all notices, writs, and other process, both from courts of law and chancery, and all orders and decrees to him legally issued and directed within his county, and he shall make due returns thereof to the proper court. If any sheriff fail herein, he shall, for every offense, be fined by the court to which the writ or process, order or decree, is returnable, in any sum not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), on motion, five days’ previous notice thereof being first given to said sheriff. The sheriff may be arrested and committed to jail until payment of the fine and cost. The sheriff and his sureties shall likewise be liable to the action of the party aggrieved by such default, for all damages sustained thereby, and also liable to all other penalties provided by law for such offenses.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (7); 1857, ch. 6, art 119; 1871, § 225; 1880, §§ 330, 1828; 1892, § 4117; 1906, § 4669; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3086; 1930, § 3316; 1942, § 4241.

§ 19-25-39.
Sheriff may employ power of the county in executing process.

If the sheriff finds that resistance will be made against the execution of any process, he shall forthwith go in his proper person, taking the power of the county if necessary, and execute the same. He shall certify to the court the names of the persons making resistance, their aiders, assistants, favorers, and procurers.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (14); 1857, ch. 6, art 130; 1871, § 236; 1880, § 341; 1892, § 4131; 1906, § 4683; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3100; 1930, § 3330; 1942, § 4255.

§ 19-25-41.
Liability of sheriff for failure to return execution.

If any sheriff or other officer properly authorized to act for him, shall fail to return any execution to him directed, on the return day thereof, the plaintiff in execution shall be entitled to recover judgment against the sheriff or other officer, and his sureties, for the amount of the execution and all costs, with lawful interest thereon until the same shall be paid, and with five percent (5%) on the full amount of the judgment as damages, to be recovered by motion before the court to which the execution is returnable, on five days’ notice first being given thereof. However, after the sheriff or other officer, or the sureties, shall have paid the amount of money and damages recovered, then the original judgment and execution shall be vested in the officer or his sureties paying the recovery and damages, for his or their benefit, and execution may issue on the original judgment, in the name of the plaintiff, for the use and benefit and at the cost and charges of the officer or his sureties in whom the judgment may be so vested. Nothing herein contained shall affect any other remedy against officers for failing to return executions, and the remedy given by this section shall apply in favor of county treasuries, clerks, and other officers and witnesses, for the recovery of all jury taxes, fees, and costs, with interest and damages thereon, in the same manner as to plaintiffs in execution. In any proceeding against a sheriff or other officer for failing to return any process, proof that the process was put in the post office, duly addressed to him, and that the postage was paid thereon, shall be prima facie evidence of the receipt thereof by the officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 7 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art 121; 1871, § 227; 1880, § 331; 1892, § 4118; 1906, § 4670; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3087; 1930, § 3317; 1942, § 4242.

§ 19-25-43.
Liability of sheriff as to final process of chancery court.

A sheriff or other officer properly authorized to act for him shall not return an execution or attachment for not performing a decree in chancery to the office whence it issued without noting thereon how he has executed the same, unless by the express direction, in writing, of the plaintiff, his agent or attorney. If a sheriff or other officer, not having such directions, shall return such execution or attachment without noting thereon how he has executed the same, he and his sureties shall be subject to all the liabilities, fines, and penalties imposed on a sheriff for failing to return an execution, recoverable in the same manner. When any execution shall be settled, or the money due thereon received, wholly or in part, by an officer, he shall make a statement of the amount thereof on the execution, including his own fees and commissions, and return the same with the execution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 122; 1871, § 228; 1880, § 332; 1892, § 4119; 1906, § 4671; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3088; 1930, § 3318; 1942, § 4243.

§ 19-25-45.
Liability of sheriff for failure to pay over money collected and similar omissions.

If any sheriff or other officer properly authorized to act for him, shall collect, by virtue of an execution or attachment, the whole or a part of the money which, by the writ, he is required to levy, and shall not immediately pay the same to the party entitled thereto, or his attorney, on demand made; or if any sheriff or other officer properly authorized to act for him, shall voluntarily, and without authority, omit to execute such process, or to levy the money therein mentioned, or do or omit anything which would entitle the plaintiff to recover from the sheriff or other officer by any action the debt, damages, or costs in the execution mentioned; then, in either of said cases, the sheriff or other officer and his sureties shall be liable to pay to the plaintiff in the execution or attachment, or to any person entitled to the money, or a part thereof, the full amount of the money due upon the execution or attachment, with twenty-five percent (25%)damages, and lawful interest until paid, to be recovered with costs by motion before the court to which the execution is returnable, on five days’ notice of the motion to the sheriff or other officer and his sureties. In case the sheriff or other officer have received only a part of the money due by the execution or attachment, and be not otherwise liable for the whole amount thereof, the recovery shall be limited to the amount received, with damages and interest. The court, at the request of either party, in case any matters of fact shall be in issue between them, shall cause a jury to be impaneled to try the same, and if the verdict be against the sheriff or other officer, judgment shall be entered up, with damages and costs, as above directed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 7 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 123; 1871, § 229; 1880, § 333; 1892, § 4120; 1906, § 4672; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3089; 1930, § 3319; 1942, § 4244.

§ 19-25-47.
Liability of sheriff for false return on any process.

If a sheriff or other officer properly authorized to act for him, make a false return on any process whatever, he shall, for every such offense, be liable to pay the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to the plaintiff named in the process, such sum being recoverable against the officer and his sureties, or the officer alone, by motion before the court to which the process is returnable, after five days’ notice of such motion to the officer and his sureties. If the returns alleged to be false do not appear on the face of the record to be so, the court shall, at the request of either party, impanel a jury to ascertain whether the return be false or not, on an issue joined under the direction of the court. If the jury find that the return is false, judgment shall be entered for the said sum against the officer and his sureties, with costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 7 (4); 1857, ch. 6, art 120; 1871, § 226; 1880, § 334; 1892, § 4121; 1906, § 4673; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3090; 1930, § 3320; 1942, § 4245.

§ 19-25-49.
Liability of sheriff for not returning money advanced for executing process in case of its non-execution.

If any sheriff fails to execute any process for the execution of which his fees have been paid in advance, and does not return with the writ the money so advanced, he shall be liable on his bond, if the process issued from the circuit or chancery court, for Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), and if from a court of a justice of the peace, for Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), which sum may be recovered on the motion of the party at whose instance the process issued, in the court from which it issued, on five days’ notice to the officer and his sureties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4122; 1906, § 4674; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3091; 1930, § 3321; 1942, § 4246.

§ 19-25-51.
Liability of sheriff for failing to pay excess money to defendants.

When the amount of the sale of property under execution or attachment shall exceed the debt, damages, interest, and costs for which the execution issued, the sheriff or other officer properly authorized to act for him shall pay the surplus to the debtor or other person entitled to receive the same. If the sheriff or other officer fails or refuses to pay such surplus when required, to the person entitled thereto, he and his sureties shall be liable to the like penalty and judgment in favor of the person entitled to the surplus, as is authorized by law in favor of the plaintiff, against the sheriff and his sureties for not paying over money levied on an execution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 124; 1871, § 230; 1880, § 335; 1892, § 4123; 1906, § 4675; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3092; 1930, § 3322; 1942, § 4247.

§ 19-25-53.
Unexecuted writs and list of prisoners to be delivered to successor sheriff.

Every sheriff, at the expiration of his term of office, or on resigning, or otherwise vacating the office, shall deliver all writs in his possession unexecuted to his successor, who shall give a receipt for the same, and shall execute and return them. The sheriff shall also deliver to his successor a certified list of the names of all persons confined in the jail, and the cause of their commitment, and a copy of said list shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the circuit court by the sheriff receiving the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (12); 1857, ch. 6, art 125; 1871, § 231; 1880, § 336; 1892, § 4124; 1906, § 4676; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3093; 1930, § 3323; 1942, § 4248.

§ 19-25-55.
Mittimus and discharge warrants preserved and turned over to successor sheriff.

All warrants, writs, orders, process, and precepts of any kind, or the attested copies thereof, by which any prisoner may be committed to or enlarged from any jail, shall be filed in their order of time, and kept by the sheriff. Upon the death, removal, resignation, or expiration of office of a sheriff, all of such warrants, writs, orders, process, or precepts, or the attested copies thereof, shall be delivered to his successor in office, on demand by him made, under the penalty of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), to be recovered of the sheriff going out of office, and his sureties, by motion before the circuit court of the county, after five days’ notice thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (19); 1857, ch. 6, art 128; 1871, § 234; 1880, § 337; 1892, § 4125; 1906, § 4677; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3094; 1930, § 3324; 1942, § 4249.